New York, session 2025-2026, A4055.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law is amended by adding a new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Prohibit the use of sale of single use plastic straws and beverage 4 stirrers in state parks. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 6 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04737-01-5